Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.260

Proof of possession as evidence of knowledge of its character.

Proof of possession of any device used for professional gambling or any record relating to professional gambling specified in RCW 9.46.215 is prima facie evidence of possession thereof with knowledge of its character or contents.

[ 1994 c 218 s 16; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.